Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 1. Authorization of Insurers and General Requirements.

Sec. 21.09.010.
Certificate of authority required.

A person may not act as an insurer and an insurer may not transact insurance in this state except as authorized by a subsisting certificate of authority issued to it by the director, except as to transactions that are expressly otherwise provided for in this title.

An insurer may not have or maintain in this state an office, representative, or other facility for the solicitation or servicing of any kind of insurance in another state unless the insurer is authorized to transact the same kind of insurance in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.09.020.
Exception from certificate of authority requirement.

A certificate of authority is not required of an insurer, not otherwise authorized in this state, with regard to

transactions relative to its policies lawfully written in the state, or liquidation of assets and liabilities of the insurer, other than collection of new premiums, resulting from its former authorized operations in the state;

related transactions subsequent to issuance of a policy covering only subjects of insurance not resident, located, or expressly to be performed in the state at time of issuance, and which coverage was lawfully solicited, written, and delivered outside the state;

transactions under surplus lines coverages lawfully written under AS 21.34;

reinsurance, except as to domestic reinsurers; or

transactions relative to policies issued in another state, but only if

the insurer does not market insurance in this state;

the laws of the state of issue apply to this state’s residents covered under the policies; and

the insurer complies with other requirements the director adopts by regulation to qualify for an exception under this paragraph.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 8 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 22 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Sec. 21.09.030.
Admission for investment only.

A foreign insurer may transact business in this state without a certificate of authority, for the purpose and to the extent only of investing its funds in real estate in this state or in securities secured thereby by complying with the applicable laws of this state other than this title. Such an insurer is not subject to any other provision of this title.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.09.040.
General eligibility of insurers.

To qualify for and hold authority to transact insurance in this state an insurer shall comply with this title and with its charter powers and shall be an incorporated stock insurer, an incorporated mutual insurer, or a reciprocal insurer, all of the same general type as may be formed as a domestic insurer under this title, except that

a foreign insurer may not be authorized to transact insurance in this state that does not maintain reserves as required by AS 21.18 applicable to the kind or kinds of insurance transacted by the insurer, wherever transacted in the United States; or that transacts business anywhere in the United States on the assessment plan, or stipulated premium plan, or any similar plan;

a foreign insurer that is directly or indirectly owned or controlled in whole or in substantial part by a government or governmental agency may not be authorized to transact insurance in this state; membership or subscribership in a mutual or reciprocal insurer by virtue of being a policyholder thereof, or ownership of stock or other security that does not have voting rights with respect to the management of the insurer, or supervision of an insurer by public authority, is not considered to be an ownership or control of the insurer for the purposes of this provision.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Collateral references. —

44 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 124 to 127.

Sec. 21.09.050.
Name of insurer.

An insurer may not be authorized to transact insurance in this state that has or uses a name so similar to that of another authorized insurer that the name is likely to mislead the public.

A life insurer may not be authorized that has or uses a name deceptively similar to that of another insurer authorized to transact insurance in this state within the preceding 10 years if life insurance policies originally issued by the other insurer are still outstanding in this state.

An insurer may not be authorized that has or uses a name that tends to deceive or mislead the public as to the type of organization of the insurer.

In case of a conflict of names between two insurers, or a conflict otherwise prohibited under (a) — (c) of this section, the director may permit or require the more recently authorized insurer to use in this state a supplementation or modification of its name or a business name that may reasonably be necessary to avoid the conflict.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.09.060.
Combinations of insuring powers in one insurer.

An insurer that otherwise qualifies may be authorized to transact any one kind or combination of kinds of insurance as defined in AS 21.12, except that

a life insurer may also grant annuities, but is not authorized to transact any other kind of insurance than health; except that if the insurer is otherwise qualified, the director shall continue to authorize a life insurer that, immediately before July 1, 1966, was lawfully authorized to transact in this state a kind or kinds of insurance in addition to life and health;

a reciprocal insurer may not transact life insurance;

a title insurer must be a stock insurer;

a property or casualty insurer may not transact life insurance and may not grant annuities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 9 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Sec. 21.09.070.
Capital funds required of foreign insurers and new domestic insurers.

To qualify for authority to transact any one kind of insurance as defined in AS 21.12, or combination of kinds of insurance as shown below, a foreign insurer, or a domestic insurer applying for its original certificate of authority in this state, after having withdrawn from this state for any cause, shall possess and after that maintain unimpaired basic paid-in capital stock if a stock insurer, or unimpaired basic surplus if a foreign mutual insurer or foreign reciprocal insurer, that is unavailable for dividends of any kind, and shall possess when first so authorized, and maintain after that, additional money in surplus, as follows:

Capital and surplus requirements are based upon all the kinds of insurance transacted by the insurer in all areas in which it operates or proposes to operate, whether or not only a portion of the kinds of insurance are to be transacted in this state. After a hearing, the director may for the protection of the public require an insurer to maintain funds in excess of the amounts required under (a) of this section, due to the amount, kind, or combination of kinds of insurance transacted by the insurer. Failure of an insurer to maintain funds as ordered by the director is grounds for suspension or revocation of the insurer’s certificate of authority.

After January 1, 1992, an insurer may not renew and continue its certificate of authority unless the insurer possesses at least the basic capital or basic surplus, and additional surplus required under this section.

As to surplus required for qualification to transact one or more kinds of insurance and thereafter to be maintained, domestic mutual insurers formed after July 1, 1966, are governed by AS 21.69 and domestic reciprocal insurers formed after July 1, 1966, are governed by AS 21.75.

A life insurer may also grant annuities without additional capital or additional surplus.

On or after January 1, 1991, a domestic property or casualty insurer may assume reinsurance, either new or renewal, (1) only of the kinds of risks, and to retain risks, within the limits it is otherwise authorized to insure; and (2) only if, in the absence of prior written approval from the director, it maintains, notwithstanding (a) of this section, in policyholder surplus at least $10,000,000 as of December 31, 1990, $15,000,000 as of December 31, 1991, and $20,000,000 as of December 31, 1992. This subsection does not apply to reinsurance that is required to be assumed by applicable law or regulation or is assumed under an intracompany pooling arrangement between affiliated insurers.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section and AS

21.09.080(a)

, a domestic insurer admitted in this state before May 16, 1990, and that has not had an ownership change after May 15, 1990, shall maintain capital and surplus of at least $4,000,000 as of January 1, 1992; $4,250,000 as of January 1, 1993; $4,500,000 as of January 1, 1994; $4,750,000 as of January 1, 1995; $5,000,000 as of January 1, 1996; and $5,250,000 as of January 1, 1997, if the domestic insurer

is not affiliated with any other insurer or group of insurers;

has capital and surplus of less than $5,250,000 on December 31, 1991;

transacts any three or more of the following kinds of insurance: property, marine and transportation, vehicle; casualty, excluding vehicle; surety; and health; and

has obtained the prior written approval of the director.

Kind or Kindsof Insurance Basic Capital or Basic GuaranteeSurplus Additional Surplus When First Authorized Additional Maintained Surplus Life $1,000,000 $1,000,000 $750,000 Health 1,000,000 1,000,000 750,000 Life and Health 1,250,000 1,250,000 1,000,000 Property 1,000,000 1,000,000 750,000 Casualty excluding vehicle 1,000,000 1,000,000 750,000 Vehicle 1,000,000 1,000,000 750,000 Marine & transportation 1,000,000 1,000,000 750,000 Surety 1,000,000 1,000,000 750,000 Title 500,000 500,000 250,000 Any three or more of the following kinds of insurance: property, marine and transportation, vehicle, casualty excluding vehicle, surety, and health 3,000,000 3,000,000 2,250,000 Legal expenses 1,000,000 1,000,000 750,000 Mortgage Guarantee 1,000,000 1,000,000 750,000

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 206 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1985; am §§ 10 — 13 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 20 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1991; am §§ 4, 5 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Sec. 21.09.080.
Capital funds required of old domestic insurers.

In order for a domestic insurer to renew and continue the insurer’s certificate of authority after January 1, 1992, the insurer must possess at least the basic capital, basic guarantee surplus, and additional maintained surplus required under AS

21.09.070(a)

.

[Repealed, § 85 ch 50 SLA 1990.]

[Repealed, § 85 ch 50 SLA 1990.]

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a domestic life insurer duly licensed and capitalized on December 31, 1984, shall have and maintain the capital and surplus required under the laws of this state on December 31, 1984, as if the laws had continued in force. This subsection does not apply to a domestic life insurer if the ownership of the insurer is changed, or the class, line, and volume of the business written is materially changed from that written on December 31, 1984.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 206 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 5 SLA 1985; am §§ 14, 85 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 21 ch 21 SLA 1991)

Sec. 21.09.090.
Deposit requirement.

This section applies to all insurers.

The director may not authorize an insurer to transact insurance in this state unless it makes and thereafter maintains in trust in this state through the director for the protection of all its policyholders or of all its policyholders and creditors, a deposit of cash or securities eligible for deposit under AS

21.24.030

in the amount of no less than $300,000, except that

from foreign insurers, in lieu of the deposit or part thereof in this state, the director may accept the certificate in proper form of the public official having supervision over insurers in any other state to the effect that a like deposit or part thereof by the insurer is being maintained in public custody or control under the law in that state in trust for the protection generally of the insurer’s policyholders or its policyholders and creditors, in the United States;

from alien insurers, in lieu of the deposit or part thereof in this state, the director may accept evidence satisfactory to the director that the insurer maintains within the United States by way of trust deposits with public depositaries, or in trust institutions acceptable to the director, assets available for discharge of its United States insurance obligations, which assets shall be in an amount not less than the outstanding liabilities of the insurer arising out of its insurance transactions in the United States together with a surplus equal to the larger of the following sums:

the largest deposit required by this title to be made by a foreign insurer transacting like kinds of insurance; or

$300,000; which surplus shall for all purposes under this title be considered to be the capital or surplus of the insurer.

Deposits of foreign insurers, or deposits of alien insurers under (b)(2)(A) or (B) of this section in another state shall be in cash or securities of substantially as high quality as those eligible for deposit in this state under AS

21.24.030

.

All such deposits in this state are subject to the applicable provisions of AS 21.24.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 206 SLA 1976; am § 11 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 14 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (b)(1) and (2) were enacted as (b)(2) and (3), respectively. Renumbered in 2000 to reflect the 1985 repeal of former (b)(1), at which time a cross-reference in subsection (c) was conformed accordingly.

Sec. 21.09.100.
Management and affiliations.

The director may not grant or continue authority to transact insurance in this state to an insurer whose principal management personnel is found by the director for good cause shown to be untrustworthy or not of good character, or so lacking in insurance company managerial experience as to make the proposed operation hazardous to the insurance-buying public or to its stockholders; or that the director has good reason to believe is affiliated directly or indirectly through ownership, control, management, reinsurance transactions, or other insurance or business relations with a person or persons whose business operations, to the detriment of insurers, stockholders, or creditors, are or have been marked by manipulation of assets, of accounts, or of reinsurance, or by bad faith.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.09.110.
Application for certificate of authority.

To apply for an original certificate of authority, an insurer shall file with the director its application, accompanied by the applicable fees set under AS

21.06.250

, showing its name, location of its home office, or principal office in the United States if an alien insurer, kinds of insurance to be transacted, date of organization or incorporation, form of organization, state or country of domicile, and additional information that the director may reasonably require, together with the following documents, as applicable:

if a foreign insurer, a copy of its corporate charter or articles of incorporation, with all amendments certified by the public officer with whom the originals are on file in the state or country of domicile;

if a reciprocal insurer, copies of the power of attorney of its attorney-in-fact and of its subscribers’ agreement, if any, certified by its attorney-in-fact;

a copy of its financial statement as of the preceding December 31 and all subsequent quarterly financial statements, sworn to by at least two executive officers of the insurer or certified by the public insurance supervisory official of the insurer’s state of domicile or of entry into the United States;

a copy of the report of last examination, if any, made of the insurer, issued by the insurance supervisory official of its state of domicile or of entry into the United States;

appointment of the director under AS

21.09.180

as its attorney to receive service of legal process;

if a foreign or alien insurer, a certificate of the public official having supervision of insurance in its state or country of domicile, or state of entry into the United States, showing that it is authorized to transact the kinds of insurance proposed to be transacted in this state;

if an alien insurer, a copy of the appointment and authority of its United States manager, certified by its officer having custody of its records; and

if a foreign insurer, a certificate as to deposit if it is to be tendered under AS

21.09.090

.

Policy forms and rates that require filing under AS 21.39 or AS 21.42 shall be submitted under AS

21.39.041

,

21.39.220

, or AS

21.42.120(b)

and may not be submitted with the application for a certificate of authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 26 SLA 1985; am § 15 ch 50 SLA 1990; am §§ 8, 9 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 5 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 2005)

Collateral references. —

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations, § 170 et seq.

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 57, 58.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, § 129.

Sec. 21.09.120.
Issuance, refusal, and ownership of certificate.

If, upon completion of its application, the director finds that the insurer has met the requirements for and is entitled to a certificate under this title, the director shall issue to the insurer a proper certificate of authority; if the director does not so find, the director shall issue an order refusing the certificate. The director shall act upon an application for a certificate of authority within 60 days after its completion.

The certificate, if issued, shall specify the kind or kinds of insurance the insurer is authorized to transact in this state. At the insurer’s request, the director may issue a certificate of authority limited to particular types of insurance or insurance coverages within the scope of a kind of insurance defined in AS 21.12.

Although issued to the insurer, the certificate of authority is at all times the property of the state. Upon the expiration, suspension, or termination of the certificate of authority the insurer shall promptly deliver it to the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 7 ch 38 SLA 2002)

Sec. 21.09.130.
Continuance, expiration, reinstatement, and amendment of certificate.

A certificate of authority issued or renewed under this title continues in force as long as the insurer is entitled to it under this title and until suspended or revoked, or otherwise terminated, subject, however, to continuance of the certificate by the insurer each year by payment before June 30 of the continuation fee set under AS

21.06.250

. The method of payment must be by electronic or other payment method specified by the director by regulation under AS

21.06.250

.

If not continued by the insurer, its certificate of authority shall be suspended at midnight on June 30 following the failure of the insurer to continue it in force. The certificate of authority shall expire on June 30 one year following its suspension due to failure to continue the certificate of authority. The director shall promptly notify the insurer of the occurrence of a failure that may result in suspension of its certificate of authority.

The director may reinstate a certificate of authority that the insurer has inadvertently permitted to expire, after the insurer has fully cured all its failures that resulted in the expiration and upon payment by the insurer of the fee for reinstatement in addition to the current continuation fee, set under AS

21.06.250

. Otherwise, the insurer shall be granted another certificate of authority only after filing an application and meeting all other requirements as for an original certificate of authority in this state.

The director may amend a certificate of authority at any time to accord with changes in the insurer’s charter of insuring powers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 4, 5 ch 26 SLA 1985; am § 10 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 8 ch 38 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For fees, see 3 AAC 31, art. 1.

Sec. 21.09.135.
Voluntary surrender of certificate of authority.

A foreign admitted insurer may apply for voluntary surrender of its certificate of authority and the director may accept the application, if the foreign admitted insurer

is in compliance with the applicable sections of this title, or the director waives in writing each condition of noncompliance;

provides written confirmation that obligations incurred before the voluntary surrender of the certificate of authority shall be paid to guarantee funds or insurance pools established by law; and

is domiciled in a state that is

accredited by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners at the time of the request for voluntary surrender; or

not accredited by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners at the time of the request and agrees in writing to be subject to

AS

21.09.200

and

21.09.205

for a period of two years, including payment of any fee related to filing information with the director; and

any other provision of this title that may be required in writing by the director and for the period of time the director may specify.

If a foreign admitted insurer who surrenders a certificate of authority ceases to exist, all business written and in force relative to a risk resident, located, or to be performed in this state shall be lawfully cancelled or reinsured. A reinsurance agreement covering all or a part of a risk described in this subsection shall be approved by the director before accepting the certificate of authority for surrender if the agreement meets the following criteria:

insurance coverage has not deteriorated from the policies existing at the time of the transfer;

the assuming insurer is of equal or better financial standing; and

the assuming insurer is admitted to do business in this state unless this requirement is waived by the director.

History.

(§ 11 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.09.140.
Mandatory revocation or suspension of certificate.

The director shall suspend or revoke an insurer’s certificate of authority

if the action is required by a provision of this title;

if the insurer no longer meets the requirements for the authority granted, on account of the insurer becoming impaired or insolvent or otherwise; or

if the insurer’s authority to transact insurance is suspended or revoked by its state of domicile, or state of entry into the United States if an alien insurer.

Except in cases of insolvency or impairment of required capital or surplus, or suspension or revocation by another state as referred to in (a)(3) of this section, the director shall give the insurer at least 15 days’ notice in advance of a suspension or revocation under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 16 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.09.150.
Suspension or revocation for violations and special grounds.

The director may suspend or revoke an insurer’s certificate of authority if, after a hearing, the director finds that the insurer has violated a lawful order of the director or a provision of this title other than those for which suspension or revocation is mandatory or has not paid any annual service fees assessed under AS

23.05.067

.

The director shall, after a hearing, suspend or revoke an insurer’s certificate of authority if the director finds that the insurer

is in unsound condition, or in a condition, or using methods or practices in the conduct of its business, that render its further transaction of insurance in this state injurious or hazardous to its policyholders or to the public;

has refused to be examined or to produce its accounts, records, and files for examination or that any of its officers have refused to give information with respect to its affairs, when required by the director;

has failed to pay a final judgment rendered against it in this state within 30 days after the judgment became final; a judgment appealed from is not final until determined by the appellate court;

with a frequency that indicates its general business practice in this state, has without just cause refused to pay proper claims arising under its policies, whether the claim is in favor of an insured or is in favor of a third person, or without just cause delays adjustment of claims, or compels the insured or claimant to accept less than the amount due them or to employ attorneys or to bring suit against the insurer or an insured to secure full payment or settlement of claims;

is affiliated with and under the same general management or interlocking directorate or ownership as another insurer that transacts direct insurance in this state without having a certificate of authority, except as permitted for surplus line insurance under AS 21.34;

has failed, after written request by the director, to remove or discharge an officer or director who has been convicted of a felony involving fraud, dishonesty, or moral turpitude.

The director may, without advance notice or a hearing, immediately suspend the certificate of authority of an insurer against which proceedings for receivership, conservatorship, rehabilitation, or other delinquency proceedings, have been commenced in any state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 76 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 2000)

Sec. 21.09.160.
Notice of suspension or revocation and effect upon agent’s authority.

Upon suspending or revoking an insurer’s certificate of authority, the director shall immediately give notice to the insurer and shall also publish notice of the revocation in one or more newspapers of general circulation in this state.

The suspension or revocation shall automatically suspend or revoke, as the case may be, the authority of all its agents and managing general agents to act as agents or managing general agents of the insurer in this state, and the insurer shall so state in the notice to agents and managing general agents provided for in (c) of this section.

Upon notification of suspension or revocation of an insurer’s certificate of authority, the insurer shall immediately give notice of the suspension or revocation to its agents and managing general agents operating in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 2, 3 ch 1 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

The last part of (a) was formerly designated (c). Reorganized in 1984.

Sec. 21.09.170.
Duration of suspension, insurer’s obligations, and reinstatement.

Suspension of an insurer’s certificate of authority shall be for a fixed period of time determined by the director, or until the occurrence of a specific event necessary for remedying the reasons for suspension. The director may modify, rescind, or reverse a suspension under this section.

During the period of suspension, the insurer

may not solicit or write any new business in this state;

shall file its annual statement and pay fees, licenses, and taxes required under this title; and

may service its outstanding business in force in this state as if the certificate had continued in full force.

If the suspension of the certificate of authority is for a fixed period of time and the certificate of authority has not been otherwise terminated, upon expiration of the suspension period, the insurer’s certificate of authority shall be reinstated unless the director finds that the insurer is not in compliance with the requirements of this title. The director shall promptly notify the insurer of any reinstatement, and the insurer may not consider its certificate of authority reinstated until notified by the director. If not reinstated, the certificate of authority expires at the end of the suspension period or at the time the insurer fails to continue the certificate during the suspension period under (b) of this section, whichever event occurs first.

If the suspension of the certificate of authority continues until the occurrence of a specific event and the certificate of authority has not been otherwise terminated, upon the presentation of evidence satisfactory to the director that the specific event has occurred, the insurer’s certificate of authority shall be reinstated unless the director finds that the insurer is not in compliance with the requirements of this title. The director shall promptly notify the insurer of any reinstatement, and the insurer may not consider its certificate of authority reinstated until notified by the director. If satisfactory evidence as to the occurrence of the specific event has not been presented to the director within five years after the date of suspension, the certificate of authority expires five years from the date of suspension or upon failure of the insurer to continue the certificate during the suspension period under (b) of this section, whichever occurs first.

The authority of the agents in this state to represent the insurer is reinstated upon reinstatement of the insurer’s certificate of authority.

The director shall promptly notify an insurer’s agents in this state, as shown by records of the director, of any reinstatement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 96 SLA 2004)

Sec. 21.09.175.
Determination of impairment.

If the director determines that an insurer transacting business in this state is impaired or in imminent danger of becoming impaired, the director may order an insurer to limit or change the insurer’s business practices, increase the insurer’s capital and surplus, or file additional reports with the director. If an insurer is aggrieved by an order under this section, the insurer may request a hearing under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.230

.

History.

(§ 15 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For definition of standards and director’s authority for companies deemed to be in an impaired financial condition, see 3 AAC 21, art. 4.

For financial examination of and annual audit reporting requirements for admitted insurers, see 3 AAC 21, art. 7.

Sec. 21.09.180.
Director attorney for service of process.

Each insurer applying for authority to transact insurance in this state shall appoint the director as its attorney to receive service of legal process issued against it in this state. The appointment shall be made on a form designated and furnished by the director. The appointment shall be irrevocable, shall bind the insurer and any successor in interest to the assets or liabilities of the insurer, and shall remain in effect as long as there is in force in this state a contract made by the insurer or obligations arising from it.

Service of process against a foreign or alien insurer shall be made only by service of process upon the director or upon a deputy or other person in charge of the office during the absence of the director. Service of process against a domestic insurer may be made either upon the director or upon the insurer corporation in the manner provided by laws applying to corporations generally, or upon the insurer’s attorney-in-fact if a domestic reciprocal insurer.

Each insurer at the time of application for a certificate of authority shall file with the director the name and address of the person to whom process against it served upon the director is to be forwarded. The insurer may change the designation by a new filing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Collateral references. —

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations, §§ 259 to 262, 488, 492 to 494, 516, 528

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 72 to 79.

Attorney representing foreign corporation in litigation as its agent for service of process in unconnected actions or proceedings. 9 ALR3d 738.

Sec. 21.09.190.
Service of process.

Duplicate copies of legal process against an insurer for whom the director is attorney under AS

21.09.180

shall be served upon the director, or upon a deputy of the director or other person in charge of the office during the absence of the director. At the time of service the plaintiff shall pay to the director a fee set under AS

21.06.250

, taxable as costs in the action. Upon receiving service the director shall promptly forward a copy by certified mail with return receipt requested to the person last designated by the insurer to receive it.

Process served upon the director and the copy forwarded as provided in this section constitutes service upon the insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 26 SLA 1985)

Sec. 21.09.200.
Annual statement; audited financial report.

Each authorized insurer shall annually, before March 2, file with the director or the director’s designee a full and true statement of its financial condition, transactions, and affairs as of the preceding December 31. The reporting format for a given year is the most recently approved National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ annual financial statement blank form and instructions, supplemented for additional information as required by the director. The director may require the statement to be filed on electronic media. The statement shall be verified by the oath of the insurer’s president or vice-president, and secretary, or, if a reciprocal insurer, by oath of the attorney-in-fact or its like officers if a corporation unless verification is waived by the director of insurance. The filing locations must be published by the director at least annually.

The statement of an alien insurer shall relate only to its transactions and affairs in the United States unless the director requires otherwise. If the director requires a statement concerning an alien insurer’s affairs throughout the world, the insurer shall file the statement with the director as soon as is reasonably possible. The statement shall be verified by the insurer’s United States manager or other authorized officer.

The director may refuse to accept a fee for continuance of the insurer’s certificate of authority, as provided in AS

21.09.130

, or may suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of an insurer failing to file its annual statement when due.

At the time of filing, the insurer shall pay to the director a fee for filing its statement, set under AS

21.06.250

. The method of payment must be by electronic or other payment method specified by the director by regulation under AS

21.06.250

.

An insurer shall pay to the division $100 for each day the insurer fails to file a statement or report in the form and location required and within the time established in this section. The authority of the insurer to enter into new obligations or issue new or renewal policies of insurance in this state may be suspended by the director if a statement or report required by this section has not been filed by the due date.

In addition to the requirements of (a) of this section, an authorized insurer shall file its annual statement with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners on electronic media acceptable to the association by the due date established by the association and shall pay the applicable filing fee. The director may waive the filing requirement if the insurer only transacts business in this state and only accepts risks relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state. An insurer that fails to comply with this subsection is subject to the penalties specified in (e) of this section, calculated from the filing and fee due date established by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

An insurer shall file with the director or the director’s designee an annual audited financial report for the previous year by June 1 of each year unless, under a regulation adopted by the director, the director grants an exemption based on a finding that filing an annual audited financial report would constitute a financial or organizational hardship on the insurer. The filing date for the annual audited financial report may be extended by the director upon showing that the standards established by regulation have been met. If the director gives the insurer 90 days’ advance notice, and for good cause, the director may require an insurer to file an audited financial report earlier than June 1 of each year. The annual audited financial report must be prepared by a qualified independent certified public accountant. An insurer shall notify the director of the certified public accountant engaged to conduct the audit and issue the annual audited financial report.

Within 60 days after filing the annual audited financial report under (g) of this section, the insurer shall file a written report on any unremediated material weakness in internal control over financial reporting noted during the audit.

The director may adopt regulations that require the insurer to file a report from management describing internal control over financial reporting. An insurer shall file the report on internal control by the date specified by the director.

If the director requires the submission of additional information, the insurer shall supplement the reports required by (h) and (i) of this section by the date specified by the director. The reports on internal control filed with the director under (h) and (i) of this section are confidential and subject to the provisions of AS

21.06.060

.

In accordance with regulations adopted by the director, an insurer shall designate an audit committee to engage a qualified independent certified public accountant to conduct the annual audit. The audit committee shall oversee services performed by the certified public accountant. If an insurer does not designate an audit committee, the entire governing board of the insurer is considered to be the audit committee for purposes of this subsection.

The certified public accountant conducting the annual audit required by (g) of this section shall notify the governing board of the insurer or the audit committee in writing of a determination by the certified public accountant that the insurer has materially misstated its financial condition as reported to the director or that the insurer does not meet the minimum capital requirements and surplus requirements of this title as of the date of the balance sheet currently under audit. An insurer that has received a report under this subsection shall forward a copy to the director. The certified public accountant shall also forward the report to the director unless the insurer provides evidence satisfactory to the certified public accountant that the report has been forwarded to the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 149 SLA 1984; am § 7 ch 26 SLA 1985; am §§ 17, 18 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 12 ch 62 SLA 1995; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 38 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 2007; am § 23 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Administrative Code. —

For record and financial reporting, see 3 AAC 21, art. 3.

For reinsurance, see 3 AAC 21, art. 6.

For financial examination of and annual audit reporting requirements for admitted insurers, see 3 AAC 21, art. 7.

For actuarial opinion and memorandum, see 3 AAC 21, art. 8.

For consumer credit insurance, see 3 AAC 28, art. 4.

For fees, see 3 AAC 31, art. 1.

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.